Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 2. Public Recreation and Playgrounds

§ 18-9-201.
Recreational facilities and systems of public recreation; authority to establish and maintain; joint action by political subdivision; tax levies; removal.

The governing body of any city, town, county or school district either independently or jointly through any combination thereof, may establish a system of public recreation as provided by W.S. 18-9-101(a)(i) through (iii) and, if it does so, shall appoint a board of trustees to control, maintain and supervise the properties. In administering properties under this section, the board may:

Adopt reasonable rules and regulations for the governance and the preservation of property within the area. All rules and regulations adopted shall be promulgated as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and shall be available for inspection in the office of the board of county commissioners. Any person violating any rule or regulation adopted under this paragraph is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or both;

Acquire, equip and maintain land, buildings or other recreational facilities;

Employ trained supervisors and directors of recreation;

Accept gifts, bequests and federal aids-in-grant for the benefit of the recreational service;

Allocate money and expend funds allocated for recreational purposes.

The board of county commissioners may levy and expend funds for recreational purposes. Any levy imposed by a school district for recreational facilities and systems of public recreation shall not exceed one (1) mill on the assessed valuation of a school district. A levy for recreational facilities and systems of public recreation imposed by a school district is in addition to the tax limitations stated in W.S.

21-13-102

.

The governing body which appointed the member of the board of trustees may remove that member of the board of trustees for cause without a public hearing unless the trustee requests that the action be taken during a public hearing. Vacancies on the board of trustees shall be filled by the governing body for the balance of the unexpired term created by the vacancy.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, § 18-328, 18-329; Laws 1971, ch. 154, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, ch. 8, § 1; 1991, ch. 87, § 1; ch. 201, § 1; 1994, ch. 19, § 1; 2012, ch. 104, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

added (c).

Laws 2012, ch. 104 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 21, 2012.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Section

15-7-103

does not repeal or limit §§

18-9-201

and

18-9-202

. —

Section

15-7-103

does not expressly or by implication repeal or limit the authority delegated by §§

18-9-201

,

18-9-202

or any other grants of authority by the state, as to recreational facilities, nor does it directly or by implication declare recreational facilities to be a strictly municipal function as contended for by counsel. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1959), decided under former § 15-532, W.S. 1957.

Stated

in

White v. Board of County Comm'rs, 77 Wyo. 246, 313 P.2d 484,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1957).

Law reviews. —

See “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of zoning regulations to golf courses, swimming pools, tennis courts, and the like, 63 ALR5th 607.

§ 18-9-202.
Recreation board of trustees.

The board of trustees appointed under W.S. 18-9-201(a) shall be comprised of not fewer than five (5) members appointed in accordance with and serving staggered terms in the same manner as specified under W.S. 18-9-102(a). If the public recreation system is established jointly, the membership shall be not fewer than five (5) members appointed in accordance with the joint agreement and each participating governing body shall have at least one (1) member on the board. Any board appointed under this article is a body corporate. Liability of board members shall be governed by W.S.

1-23-107

.

The recreation board shall manage, operate and regulate the recreational systems and may take any steps necessary to insure the safe, economical and enjoyable operation of the system.

The recreation board may accept and use any gift, donation, bequest, devise or contribution of money or property. Any monies accruing from a tax levy or appropriation made by the governing bodies involved in the recreational system shall be credited to the board and may be expended by them for the maintenance, improvement, development, operation, management and conduct of the system, and the erection and repair of the physical properties under its control. All payments made shall be with the approval of the board and upon the signature of the treasurer.

The recreation board shall elect from among its members a president, secretary and a treasurer. The members of the board shall serve without compensation except the board may allow reasonable compensation to the secretary for secretarial or other services required of him. The treasurer shall give bond in such amount and with securities approved by the governing bodies involved, conditioned upon the faithful performance of his duties and the full accounting of monies received by him.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 24, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 18-330; Laws 1963, ch. 164, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1989, ch. 55, § 1; 1991, ch. 87, § 1.